Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1415
Initiative or referendum; approved; preservation and printing.

If an initiative or referendum is approved by the voters at the general election, the copies of the initiative or referendum petition filed with the Secretary of State and a certified copy of the Governor's proclamation declaring the measure approved by the people shall be identified and preserved. The Secretary of State shall cause every measure approved by the people to be printed with the general laws enacted by the next session of the Legislature with the date of the Governor's proclamation declaring the same to have been approved by the people.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 397.